Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 13
VOLUNTEER HEALTH INSURANCE ACT

31-30-1301. Short title.

This part 13 shall be known and may be cited as the "Volunteer Health Insurance Act".

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 579, § 3, effective August 5.

31-30-1302. Definitions.

As used in this part 13, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Bona fide volunteer":

Has the meaning set forth in section 31-30-1202; and

Means any volunteer member of a rescue unit as defined in section 25-3.5-103, C.R.S.

"Carrier" means an entity that provides health coverage in this state, including a franchise insurance plan, a fraternal benefit society, a health maintenance organization, a nonprofit hospital and health service corporation, a sickness and accident insurance company, and any other entity providing a health insurance or health benefits plan or policy subject to the insurance laws and regulations of Colorado.

"Emergency service provider"has the meaning set forth in section 29-11-101, C.R.S.

"Group health insurance plan" means a group sickness and accident insurance plan as described in section 10-16-214, C.R.S.

"Qualified services" means firefighting and fire prevention services, emergency medical services, ambulance services, and search and rescue services.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 579, § 3, effective August 5.

31-30-1303. Group health insurance plan.

The governing body of an emergency service provider may enter into insurance contracts with carriers to provide group health insurance plans for its bona fide volunteers. The cost of the plans, sources of funding, amount of contributions required from bona fide volunteers, coverage parameters, and eligibility requirements shall be negotiated by the governing body and the carrier. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a governing body from participating in an insurance pool or from allowing its bona fide volunteers to participate in the group health insurance plan offered to the paid employees of the governing body.

The administration and management of a group health insurance plan shall be the exclusive responsibility of the carriers of the plan.

This section shall apply only to bona fide volunteers deemed to be active and in good standing by the emergency service provider.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 580, § 3, effective August 5.